Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
NOMINATION; DETERMINATION OF CANDIDATES

§12-1 Application of chapter. All
candidates for elective office, except as provided in section 14-21, shall be
nominated in accordance with this chapter and not otherwise. [L 1970, c 26, pt
of §2]

Law Journals and Reviews

The Protection of Individual Rights Under Hawai‘i's Constitution. 14 UH L.
Rev. 311.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next